Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 4. New Promise and Payment

§ 591.
New promise must be in writing and signed.

An acknowledgment or promise shall not be held to affect a defense made under the provisions of this chapter, unless such acknowledgment or promise is in writing signed by the party affected thereby.

§ 592.
Indorsement or memorandum of payment.

This chapter shall not alter or take away the effect of the payment of any principal or interest; but an indorsement or memorandum of such payment made upon a promissory note, bill of exchange, or other writing, unless in the handwriting of the party making the payment, shall not be proof of the payment sufficient to take the cause out of the provisions of this chapter.

§ 593.
Joint promisors—Promise or payment by one.

When there are two or more joint contractors, or joint executors, or administrators of a contractor, such joint contractor, executor, or administrator shall not lose the benefit of the provisions of this chapter, so as to be chargeable by reason of an acknowledgment, promise, or payment made or signed by any other of them.

Partnership debt and funds.

Payment by one of several makers of joint and several promissory note who were in fact partners when they signed note, will take it out of statute of limitations as to others, if note be a partnership debt, and payment made out of partnership funds. Mix v. Shattuck, 50 Vt. 421 (1878); Carlton v. Mill, 28 Vt. 504 (1856), same case 27 Vt. 496.

Payments made by treasurer of partnership from partnership funds, and by him indorsed on partnership note took note out of statute of limitations, in absence of any showing that he acted without authority and without duty. Walker v. Wait, 50 Vt. 668, 1878 Vt. LEXIS 33 (1878).

§ 594.
Recovery where action not barred as to all.

In actions against two or more joint contractors, or joint executors or administrators of a contractor, if it appears on the trial that the plaintiff is barred by the provisions of this chapter as to any of the defendants, but is entitled to recover against any other of them by virtue of a new acknowledgment or promise, or otherwise, judgment shall be given for the plaintiff as to any of the defendants against whom he or she is entitled to recover, and for the other defendant or defendants against the plaintiff.

§ 595.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.